Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,260
Volkswagen Settlement Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Volkswagen Settlement Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment. All sums of money received from the Volkswagen Settlement shall be deposited in the fund. The department shall expend the fund in accordance with the department use plan. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The balance of any account established to receive and expend revenue from the Volkswagen Settlement shall be transferred to the Volkswagen Settlement Cash Fund.

Laws 2019, LB298, § 22;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 441.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.